District of Columbia statutes.
7-2603

Immunity from liability.

Any person, hospital, or institution participating in good faith in the making of a report pursuant to this chapter shall have immunity from any liability, civil or criminal, that might otherwise be incurred or imposed with respect to the making of such report. Any such participant shall have the same immunity with respect to participation in any judicial proceeding resulting from such report.

Nov. 6, 1966, 80 Stat. 1355, Pub. L. 89-776, § 3

History

1981 Ed., § 2-1363.
1973 Ed., § 2-183.

Prior Codifications